Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 5 Museums
Subchapter 4

— Museum of Natural Resources

Cross References.

Taxes levied for benefit of Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources, §26-58-301 et seq.

Preambles.

Acts 1979, No. 832 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, museums preserve our heritage for the benefit, enjoyment, and education of the citizens of all ages and from every community in Arkansas; and

“Whereas, museums are unique cultural resources through the preservation, exhibition, and documentation of historically, scientifically, and artistically significant facts and artifacts; and

“Whereas, museums provide a unique educational tool which can directly supplement the state's educational system through demonstrating the use and significance of said artifacts;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1977, No. 310, § 6: Feb. 28, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Arkansas is a major oil producing state and was in the center of the oil boom shortly after World War I; that the oil resources of the state and the country are declining and may become a thing of the past; that there is a treasure of sites and equipment of the type used for oil and gas production in the early oil boom days; that such equipment and sites should be preserved and properly displayed for future generations, as part of the developing history of Arkansas; and that this act is designed to provide for preserving such equipment and sites and should be given effect as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 832, § 15: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an immediate need to establish Arkansas Museum Services and transfer the Des Arc Archeological Center, the Museum and Cultural Commission and the Arkansas Oil Museum to the Museum Services Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism so as to ensure the preservation of, the state's heritage and to assist, promote, and advance the purposes of the museums throughout Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-5-401. Museum established.

The State Parks Division is authorized and directed to establish a state historical museum in Union County to be known and operated as the “Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources”.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 310, § 1; 1979, No. 832, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 53-1201; Acts 1997, No. 383, § 1; 2001, No. 802, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 5580.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 802, § 12, provided:

“All powers, duties, and functions of the Museum Services Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism are hereby transferred to the State Parks Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1979, No. 832, § 10, as amended, provided, in part, that all powers, functions, and duties of the Office of Arkansas Arts and Humanities regarding the Arkansas Oil and Brine Museum were transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism, Museum Services Division, by a type 2 transfer as provided in §25-2-105. All records, files, equipment, supplies, and funds held by the Office of Arkansas Arts and Humanities in connection with the Arkansas Oil and Brine Museum were transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism, Museum Services Division. The same transfers of powers and property were provided for in Acts 1979, No. 207, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “State Parks” for “Arkansas Museum Services”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Parks and Tourism” following “State Parks Division”.

13-5-402. Functions and duties.

(a)

The Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources shall be developed and operated by the State Parks Division and shall be devoted primarily to the acquisition, cataloging, and display of machinery, equipment, and materials used in the oil boom in Arkansas.

(b)

In addition, the museum shall solicit, purchase, or accept donations of maps, core drilling samples, and other records of geological or historical value to be made available to the public as a source of historical information concerning the geology and technology of the oil industry in this state.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 310, § 2; 1979, No. 832, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 53-1202; Acts 1997, No. 383, § 2; 2001, No. 802, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 5581.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “State Parks” for “Arkansas Museum Services” in (a); and, in (b), substituted “museum” for “Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources”, and deleted a comma following “value”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Parks and Tourism” following “State Parks Division” in (a).

13-5-403. Museum site.

The Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources shall be established at a site to be approved by the State Parks Division, with the lands therefor, which shall consist of not fewer than five (5) acres, to be donated without cost to the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 310, § 1; 1979, No. 832, § 10; 1985, No. 560, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 53-1201; Acts 1997, No. 383, § 3; 2001, No. 802, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 5582.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “State Parks Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism” for “Arkansas Museum Services Division”, and substituted “fewer” for “less”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Parks and Tourism” following “State Parks Division”.

13-5-404. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Arkansas Museum of Natural Resources Advisory Committee, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 540, § 13. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 310, § 3; 1979, No. 832, § 12; 1985, No. 802, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 53-1203; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 78; 1997, No. 383, § 4; 2001, No. 802, § 7.

Subchapter 5

— County Museums

Effective Dates.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-5-501. Establishment.

(a)

The quorum courts of the respective counties of this state are authorized, by ordinance approved by a majority of the members of the quorum court, to establish a county museum, to be under the direction of a county museum commission as provided in this subchapter.

(b)(1)

The provisions of this subchapter shall not affect the county museum of any county which, on July 6, 1977, had established and was operating a county museum.

(2)

However, the quorum court of any such county may elect to place the operation of the museum under a county museum commission as authorized in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 247, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-1901.

Cross References.

County boards, establishment, §14-14-701 et seq.

13-5-502. Museum commissions — Members.

(a)(1)

In those counties in which the quorum court shall elect to establish a county museum under the provisions of this subchapter, the museum shall be under the direct management and control of a county museum commission, which shall consist of three (3), six (6), or nine (9) members to be appointed by the county judge, subject to confirmation and approval of the quorum court.

(2)(A)

The size of the commission shall be determined by the quorum court in collaboration with the museum director and the chair of the commission if they exist at the time of the determination.

(B)

The determination of size shall be made considering the size of the museum and the population of the county.

(b)(1)

The county judge shall specify, at the time of appointment, the respective terms of the first members appointed to the commission in such a manner that the terms of one (1), two (2), or three (3) members shall expire on January 1 of the year next following the appointment of that member, and the remaining members shall be appointed in such a manner that the term of one (1) member shall expire on January 1 of each year thereafter.

(2)

Successor members shall be appointed for three-year staggered terms and shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(c)

If any vacancy shall occur on the commission, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired portion of the term, in the same manner as provided for the initial appointment.

(d)

Members of the commission shall serve without pay.

(e)

The commission shall elect one of its members as chair and shall also elect such other officers as the commission may deem necessary, from time to time.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 247, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-1902; Acts 1999, No. 1372, § 1.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment, in (a), substituted “consist of three (3), six (6), or nine (9) members” for “consist of seven (7) members” and added the last two sentences; and, in (b), substituted “terms of one (1), two (2), or three (3) members” for “term of one (1) member” and substituted “three-year” for “seven-year.”

13-5-503. Commissions' powers and duties.

County museum commissions established under the provisions of this subchapter shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)

To buy, lease, lend, acquire, and own real and personal property required in the housing and operation of the county museum;

(2)

To accept gifts, grants, or donations of real and personal property from the federal government, the State of Arkansas, and from other public or private groups or individuals, to be used for the purposes of this subchapter;

(3)

To receive and expend funds appropriated by the General Assembly for county museum purposes;

(4)

To acquire, preserve, and display items of historical or archeological interest;

(5)

To enter into agreements with other counties, municipalities, the state or federal government, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or with any private museum or groups or persons to exchange or loan items of historical or archeological interest;

(6)

To enter into agreements with the Division of Arkansas Heritage and other public and private agencies or persons, for the purpose of sharing services and facilities, with the view that the historical and cultural resources of this state may be coordinated at the county and state levels for the benefit of the public of this state;

(7)

To enter into cooperative agreements under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, §25-20-101 et seq., with one (1) or more adjoining counties to form a joint or regional museum, and, in those agreements, to establish the governing organization and procedures for the operation of the joint or regional museum, including costs, financial agreements, and contributions for the operation of and sharing in the cost of the operation of the joint or regional museum;

(8)

To promulgate reasonable rules for the operation of the museum, including the establishment, if deemed necessary, of reasonable admission charges to assist in defraying the cost of operating the museum;

(9)

To employ necessary personnel required in the maintenance and operation of the museum; and

(10)

To do all other things necessary to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 247, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-1903; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 117; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 117; 2019, No. 910, § 5583.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “Arkansas History Commission, the” preceding “Department” in (6); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (6).

13-5-504. Funds for construction and maintenance.

County quorum courts are authorized to appropriate county funds to defray the costs of, in whole or in part, the construction, maintenance, and operation of the county museum.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 247, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-1904.

13-5-505. Des Arc Archeological Museum — Transfer to and assumption of ownership by Prairie County.

(a)

In the event the Prairie County Quorum Court shall establish a county museum and shall, in the ordinance establishing the county museum, elect to take over the ownership, management, and operation of the Des Arc Archeological Museum, the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism is authorized and directed to convey to the Lower White River Museum State Park all rights, title, and interest of the State of Arkansas in the Des Arc Archeological Museum, to be thereafter operated, maintained, and improved by Prairie County as a part of the Lower White River Museum State Park.

(b)

Any funds appropriated to the department by the General Assembly for the Des Arc Archeological Museum shall be remitted to the Prairie County Museum Commission on or before the fifteenth day after the beginning of each fiscal year for which the funds are appropriated and available.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 247, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-1905; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5584.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a).

Subchapter 6

— Arkansas Post Museum

Effective Dates.

Acts 1989, No. 482, § 3: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the government of Arkansas County has offered to the state an established and operating museum that focuses on the territorial development of Arkansas; that this act provides for the establishment of a state museum on that site; and that for the effective administration of this act, the act should become effective July 1, 1989. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-5-601. Authorization.

The State Parks Division is authorized and directed to develop and operate a state historical museum in Arkansas County to be known and operated as the “Arkansas Post Museum”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 482, § 1; 2001, No. 802, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 5585.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 802, § 12, provided:

“All powers, duties, and functions of the Museum Services Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism are hereby transferred to the State Parks Division of the Deprartment of Parks and Tourism.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 482, § 1, provided, in part, that the museum shall be established at the site of the existing Arkansas Post County Museum, with the buildings, land, collections, and all operational supplies and equipment to be donated without cost to the Historical Resources and Museum Services Section of the Parks Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “State Parks” for “Arkansas Museum Services”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Parks and Tourism” following “State Parks Division”.

13-5-602. Functions and duties.

(a)

The Arkansas Post Museum shall be developed and operated by the State Parks Division and shall be devoted primarily to the acquisition, cataloging, and display of objects or materials which tell the story of the territorial settlement and development of Arkansas as a state and its relationship to the settlement of the lower Mississippi Valley.

(b)

With the approval of the Director of the State Parks Division, the museum shall solicit, purchase, or accept donations of objects or materials of historical value to be made available to the public as a source of historical information concerning the territorial development and settlement of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 482, § 1; 2001, No. 802, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 5586.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment substituted “State Parks” for “Arkansas Museum Services” in (a); and in (b), inserted “With the approval of the Director of the State Parks Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism”, substituted “museum” for “Arkansas Post Museum”, and deleted “with the approval of the Director of the State Parks Division” from the end.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Parks and Tourism” following “State Parks Division” in (a) and (b).

13-5-603, 13-5-604. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning the Arkansas Post Museum Advisory Committee members and duties, were repealed by Acts 2009, No. 1484, § 3. The sections were derived from the following sources:

13-5-603. Acts 1989, No. 482, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 79; 2001, No. 802, § 10.

13-4-604. Acts 1989, No. 482, § 1; 2001, No. 802, § 11.

Subchapter 7

— Delta Cultural Center

Effective Dates.

Acts 1989, No. 109, § 7: Feb. 20, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly that Arkansas is blessed with a diverse set of cultures, and that the Mississippi Delta is one of the most depressed areas in Arkansas. In order to preserve the heritage of the Delta as well as to capitalize on an abundant opportunity for tourism development in Eastern Arkansas, Arkansas should proceed with plans to develop a multi-state historic, cultural, and performing arts center at Helena. This Act should become effective immediately to provide for the proper administration of this program. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-5-701. Intent.

(a)(1)

The development of the Arkansas Delta was marked by the diversity of ethnic groups who were interdependent within the agricultural economy. Interpretation of the development of this area is important both to understanding the past and its effects on the future and to the economic development of the area through increased tourism.

(2)

No facility now exists to interpret this vital portion of southern Arkansas Delta agricultural culture. The establishment of the Delta Cultural Center will fill this void.

(b)

The center will establish a resource to study, preserve, perpetuate, interpret, and present the rich cultural heritage representative of a rural Arkansas Delta community whose economic dependence on agriculture fostered its development.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 109, § 1.

13-5-702. Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

(1)

“Board” means the Delta Cultural Center Policy Advisory Board appointed by the Governor;

(2)

“Center” means the Delta Cultural Center;

(3)

“Center director” means the Director of the Delta Cultural Center; and

(4)

[Repealed.]

(5)

[Repealed.]

(6)

“National board” means the national advisory board appointed by the Governor to broaden the perspective of the center's activities and programming.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 109, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5587.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (4) and (5).

13-5-703. Establishment.

(a)(1)

There is established the Delta Cultural Center which shall be a division of the Division of Arkansas Heritage. The center shall be located in Helena-West Helena.

(2)

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, with the advice and consent of the Governor, shall employ the Director of the Delta Cultural Center. All other employees of the center shall be employed by and serve at the pleasure of the secretary.

(b)(1)

The center shall operate a program of temporary and permanent exhibits, a library and resource center, and live performances and shall provide information on related activities in other parts of the Arkansas Delta region.

(2)

The attraction of visitors to the Arkansas Delta shall be a major goal of the center.

(c)(1)

All budgeting, purchasing, and related management functions of the center shall be performed under the direction and supervision of the secretary.

(2)

The secretary, after seeking the advice of the Delta Cultural Center Policy Advisory Board, shall promulgate any rules necessary for the implementation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 109, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 5588.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” and “Helena-West Helena” for “Helena”; substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” twice in (a)(2) and twice in (c); and substituted “employ” for “appoint” in (a)(2).

13-5-704. Delta Cultural Center Policy Advisory Board.

(a)

There is created the Delta Cultural Center Policy Advisory Board, which shall advise the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, the Director of the Division of Arkansas Heritage, and staff of the Delta Cultural Center on:

(1)

The development of permanent and temporary exhibits;

(2)

A plan for the acquisition of resource materials; and

(3)

The development of educational and other programming.

(b)(1)

The board shall consist of eleven (11) members.

(2)(A)

The members shall be appointed by the Governor. The members appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. The Governor shall make the appointments in such a manner that each race or ethnic group having a significant presence in the Arkansas Delta region shall be adequately represented on the board.

(B)

The board members to be appointed by the Governor shall be:

(i)

Two (2) residents of Phillips County who have exhibited an interest in the culture and heritage of the Delta;

(ii)

A Delta blues musician;

(iii)

Two (2) members to serve as academic advisors who shall be trained in the field of Delta folklore, history, or a related field;

(iv)

[Repealed.]

(v)

Three (3) members at large; and

(vi)

Two (2) members as representatives of Main Street Helena.

(3)

The board shall meet at least quarterly. Special meetings may be called by the chair or a majority of the board.

(c)(1)

The members of the board appointed by the Governor shall serve for three-year terms.

(2)

No member of the board shall be eligible for appointment to more than two (2) consecutive full terms.

(d)

The chair will be elected by members for a one-year term.

(e)

Any vacancy in the membership of the board other than by the expiration of the term of office shall be filled by the Governor for the balance of the term of the membership that became vacant.

(f)

The members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services, but they may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 109, § 4; 1997, No. 250, § 80; 1999, No. 1074, § 1; 2001, No. 1260, § 1; 2015, No. 1100, § 11; 2017, No. 720, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5589.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 109, § 4, provided, in part, that, in making initial appointments to the board, the Governor shall designate three members to serve one-year terms, three members to serve two-year terms, and three members to serve three-year terms; that initial appointees who are appointed for less than a three-year term may be eligible for appointment to two full terms; and that the first chairman of the board will be appointed by the Governor for a one-year term.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment redesignated (b); substituted “nine (9) members” for “eleven (11) members” in (b)(1); substituted “The” for “Nine (9)” in (b)(2)(A); deleted former (b)(2)(B); and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1)-(3) and made related changes; substituted “for the acquisition” for “for aquisition” in (a)(2); substituted “eleven (11)” for “nine (9)” in (b)(1); added (b)(2)(B)(vi); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Humanities Council” for “Board of the Arkansas Endowment for the Humanities”
in (b)(2)(B)(iv).

The 2017 amendment repealed (b)(2)(B)(iv).

The 2019 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism”, substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage”; and made stylistic changes.

13-5-705. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Delta Cultural Center National Advisory Board, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 720, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1989, No. 109, § 4.

13-5-706. Powers.

(a)

The Delta Cultural Center shall have the power to:

(1)

Enter into contracts for the purchase, construction, lease, or other acquisition of real property to house the center and to acquire or construct necessary support facilities, including, but not limited to, overnight accommodations for visitors;

(2)

Enter into contracts to purchase or lease personal property for use as exhibits or for use as research material related to the culture of the Delta; and

(3)

Enter into professional service contracts with appropriate professionals to assist in the establishment of the center and the development and operation of the center's programs and activities.

(b)

The center shall have the authority to accept gifts of real or personal property and money.

(c)(1)

The center shall have the authority to set fees related to the programs and services offered by the center, including, but not limited to, admission fees.

(2)

Income generated by fees shall be cash funds of the center to be used solely for the support of the center. Fee income shall be deposited in a bank account but shall be subject to appropriation by the General Assembly.

(d)(1)

The center may request the assistance of the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism and any other appropriate state agency in establishing and operating the center and its programs.

(2)

The director of any state agency requested to assist in the establishment and operation of the center shall, within the limits of available personnel and resources, provide such assistance.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 109, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 5590.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (d)(1).

Subchapter 8

— Arkansas Cotton Museum

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-5-801. Arkansas Cotton Museum established.

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism is authorized to coordinate the establishment of a historical museum in Lee County, to be known and operated as the “Arkansas Cotton Museum”. The museum shall be established in association with the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1121, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5591.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in the first sentence; substituted “Cooperative Extension Service” for “Agricultural Experiment Station in Lee County” in the second sentence; and made a stylistic change.

13-5-802. Functions and duties.

(a)

The Arkansas Cotton Museum shall be devoted primarily to the acquisition, cataloging, and display of machinery, equipment, and materials used in cotton production in Arkansas.

(b)

In addition, the museum may purchase or accept donations of items and records of historical value, to be made available to the public as a source of historical information concerning the cotton industry in this state.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1121, § 2.

Subchapter 9

— Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-5-901. Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

(1)

“Board” means the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise Advisory Board created by this subchapter;

(2)

“Center” means the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise created by this subchapter;

(3)

“Center director” means the Director of the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise;

(4)

[Repealed.]

(5)

[Repealed.]

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1176, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5592.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (4) and (5).

13-5-902. Establishment — Administration.

(a)(1)

There is established the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise which shall be a division of the Division of Arkansas Heritage.

(2)(A)

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, with the advice and consent of the Governor, shall appoint the Director of the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise.

(B)

All other employees of the center shall be employed by and serve at the pleasure of the secretary in compliance with state law.

(b)

The center shall operate a program of temporary and permanent exhibits, a library and resource center, and live performances. The attraction of visitors shall be a major goal of the center.

(c)(1)

All budgeting, purchasing, and related management functions of the center shall be performed under the direction and supervision of the secretary, in consultation with the director in compliance with state law.

(2)

The secretary, after seeking the advice of the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise Advisory Board, shall promulgate any rules necessary for the implementation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1176, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5593.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a)(1); substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(B); inserted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, in consultation with the” in (c)(1); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Director of the Mosaic Templars of America Center for African-American Culture and Business Enterprise” in (c)(2).